Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,173
Commercial trucks and truck-tractors; commercial vehicles; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who fails to return a registration certificate and license plate when required to do so under subdivision (5)(b) of section 60-3,147 and any person, firm, association, or corporation who otherwise violates section 60-3,147 or 60-3,148 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 173.